Georgia statutes. TITLE 4 Animals
PART 2 Feeding Garbage to Animals

4-4-20.
“Garbage” defined.

The term “garbage,” as used in this part, except as otherwise provided in this part, means all refuse matter, animal or vegetable; by-products of a restaurant, kitchen, or slaughterhouse; and every refuse accumulation of animal, fruit, or vegetable matter, liquid or otherwise. This term includes the word “swill” as commonly used.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 6; Ga. L. 1971, p. 60, § 4.

4-4-21.
Feeding garbage to animals generally.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, it shall be unlawful for any person to feed garbage to animals; provided, however, that an individual may feed garbage to his own animals if he feeds them only with garbage from his own household.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 2.

4-4-22.
Feeding garbage to swine.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Garbage” means any refuse matter or by-product which contains animal tissue or which has been mixed with any animal tissue, whether liquid or otherwise.

“Person” means any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or association or any agency, department, or other political subdivision of the state or any other entity.

It shall be unlawful for any person to feed garbage to swine or to place garbage in such a position or location as to permit its consumption by swine, except as otherwise provided in this Code section. Persons who negligently or intentionally provide garbage or sources of garbage to other persons found to be feeding garbage to swine in violation of this part shall be deemed culpable and responsible for the violative acts of feeding as if they were the actual feeders of the garbage.

This Code section shall not apply to any person who:

Raises swine solely for slaughter and consumption on the farm or property on which the swine are raised;

Does not purchase and import or permit the importation onto such farm or property on which swine are raised any swine, portion of the carcass of any swine, pork food product, or garbage containing any animal tissue, whether liquid or otherwise; and

Does not sell, trade, exchange, export, or otherwise dispose of any swine, portion of the carcass of any swine, pork food product, or any garbage or refuse containing any portion thereof outside of such farm or property on which the swine are raised.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor. Each day in which such violation occurs shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Ga. L. 1971, p. 60, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 225, § 1.

4-4-23.
Licensing of garbage feeders.

No person shall feed garbage to swine without first applying for and obtaining a license from the Commissioner. There shall be no fee for such license, and it shall be valid until and unless revoked or canceled. The requirement of obtaining a license shall not apply to an individual feeding his own animals garbage from his own household. No license which will permit the feeding of any garbage, as that term is defined in subsection (a) of Code Section 4-4-22, to swine shall be issued to any person who does not meet the qualifications of subsection (c) of Code Section 4-4-22.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 3; Ga. L. 1960, p. 939, § 1; Ga. L. 1971, p. 60, § 2.

4-4-24.
Cancellation, suspension, or revocation of licenses.

Every licensed feeder of garbage who violates this part or the rules and regulations promulgated by the Commissioner pursuant thereto shall have his license revoked, canceled, or suspended, upon a notice and hearing.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 5.

4-4-25.
Administrative remedies.

Any person affected by this part or by any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto shall have and shall be required to exhaust the administrative remedies provided by Code Section 4-6-8.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 7.

4-4-26.
Penalty for violations of part or rules or regulations promulgated thereunder.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation which violates any provision of this part or any rule or regulation made pursuant thereto shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 480, § 8; Ga. L. 1956, p. 85, § 1.